Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 35

State of Tennessee Audit Committee Act of 2005

4-35-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State of Tennessee Audit Committee Act of 2005.”

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 2.

4-35-102. Creation of audit committees.

A state governing board, council, commission, or equivalent body that has the authority to hire and terminate its employees shall create an audit committee, subject to subsection (c).

A state governing board, council, commission, or equivalent body that is responsible for the preparation of financial statements, whether included in the financial statements of other entities or free standing, shall create an audit committee, subject to subsection (c).

A state governing board, council, commission, or equivalent body subject to subsections (a) and (b) may be excepted from the requirement to form an audit committee only upon the approval of the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 3.

4-35-103. Development of charter — Guidelines for and review of charter — Approval.

An audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall develop a written charter addressing the audit committee's purpose, powers, duties, and mission.

The comptroller of the treasury shall establish guidelines for creation of an audit committee charter and shall review the proposed charter to determine whether the charter contains the minimum necessary requirements.

The charter, and any subsequent amendments, shall be presented to the full state governing board, council, commission, or equivalent body, and the comptroller of the treasury for approval.

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 4.

4-35-104. Standing committee — Members — Meetings.

The audit committee shall be a standing committee of the state governing board, council, commission, or equivalent body.

An audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall have at a minimum three (3) members, chosen as prescribed in the audit committee charter.

The audit committee's charter shall provide for the frequency of and procedures relative to conducting meetings.

The audit committee shall meet upon the request of the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 5.

4-35-105. Responsibilities of audit committee.

The responsibilities of an audit committee created pursuant to this chapter include, but are not limited to:

Overseeing the financial reporting and related disclosures, especially when financial statements are issued;

Evaluating management's assessment of the body's system of internal controls;

Formally reiterating, on a regular basis, to the state governing board, council, commission, equivalent body, or management and staff of the agency to which the audit committee is attached, the responsibility of the state governing board, council, commission, equivalent body, or management and staff of the agency for preventing, detecting, and reporting fraud, waste, and abuse;

Serving as a facilitator of any audits or investigations of the body to which the audit committee is attached, including advising auditors and investigators of any information the audit committee may receive pertinent to audit or investigative matters;

Informing the comptroller of the treasury of the results of assessment and controls to reduce the risk of fraud; and

Promptly notifying the comptroller of the treasury of any indications of fraud.

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 6.

4-35-106. Powers and duties.

An audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall have the power and duty to take whatever actions the audit committee deems necessary in carrying out its responsibilities in this chapter, including, but not limited to:

Seeking information the audit committee requires from employees or external parties;

Meeting with agency management, board, council, commission, or equivalent body members, external and internal auditors, legal counsel, or others as necessary; and

Requiring internal auditors to report directly to the audit committee.

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 7.

4-35-107. Establishment of confidential reporting of illegal, improper, wasteful or fraudulent activity.

An audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall establish a process by which employees, taxpayers, or other citizens may confidentially report suspected illegal, improper, wasteful, or fraudulent activity. If the information provided causes the chair of the audit committee to believe that illegal, improper, wasteful, or fraudulent activity may have occurred, then the chair of the audit committee shall report the information to the office of the comptroller of the treasury. The comptroller of the treasury shall have the power to prescribe the method of making the report by the chair of the audit committee. The detailed information received and generated pursuant to a report of suspected illegal, improper, wasteful, or fraudulent activity shall be considered audit working papers and is therefore not an open record pursuant to title 10, chapter 7.

Section 8-50-116 shall apply to all state governing board, council, commission or equivalent body employees. In addition, no state governing board, council, commission or equivalent body's employees shall suffer any of the prohibited retaliatory actions specified in § 8-50-116 for reporting or cooperating with the audit committee, internal auditors, or auditors from, or approved by, the comptroller of the treasury, or for reporting any facts to the state governmental body to which the audit committee is attached. Any person who knowingly and willingly retaliates or takes adverse action of any kind against any person for reporting alleged wrongdoing pursuant to this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 8; 2013, ch. 64, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, 40-35-111.

4-35-108. Notice of meetings — Open meetings — Exceptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b), all meetings of an audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall abide by the notice requirements adhered to by the state governing board, council, commission, or equivalent body to which the audit committee is attached.

All meetings of an audit committee created pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the open meetings provisions of title 8, chapter 44, except that the audit committee may hold confidential, nonpublic executive sessions to discuss:

Items deemed not subject to public inspection under §§ 10-7-503 and 10-7-504, and all other matters designated as confidential or privileged under this code;

Litigation;

Audits or investigations;

Information protected by federal law; and

Matters involving information under § 4-35-107(a), where the informant has requested anonymity.

No business, other than that described under subdivisions (b)(1)-(5), shall be considered during a confidential, nonpublic executive session by the audit committee.

For purposes of providing notice of a confidential, nonpublic executive session, the agenda must disclose the general nature of discussion as described under subdivisions (b)(1)-(5).

A meeting at which both subject matter open to the public and confidential subject matter will be discussed shall be conducted as follows:

All business relating to subject matter that is public in nature shall be conducted first; and

At the conclusion of the meeting relating to subject matter that is public in nature, the chair shall announce that the public portion of the meeting is adjourned and that the remainder of the meeting will concern matters that are confidential under subdivisions (b)(1)-(5). When everyone at the meeting who is not authorized to attend the confidential portion of the meeting has departed, the confidential portion of the meeting shall commence.

This chapter is not intended to prevent the full state governing board, commission, council, or equivalent body from going into confidential, nonpublic executive session for the purpose of further discussing those matters as described under subdivisions (b)(1)-(5). All portions of meetings of the full state governing board, commission, council, or equivalent body, where matters described under subdivisions (b)(1)-(5) will be discussed, shall be exempt from title 8, chapter 44; provided, that the full state governing board, commission, council or equivalent body shall abide by the notice requirements of subsections (c)-(e).

Acts 2005, ch. 310, § 9.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.